Donald Trump|Speech: Donald Trump in Baton Rouge, LA|December 9, 2016
[This was transcribed and punctuated by Factba.se's AI, Margaret, and automatically corrected based on her understanding of Donald Trump's speech patterns. It has not been edited by a human. Please double-check any quotes against the video.]
Wow, is this a great country or what I can't believe this, I mean, last weekend, can't believe this, I mean, last weekend, can't believe this. I mean last weekend Vice president-elect pence was here now, Vice president-elect pence was here now. Vice president-elect pence was here. Now president-elect Donald Trump, this is way president-elect Donald Trump.
This is way president-elect Donald Trump. This is way above my pay grade folks. My name is John above my pay grade folks. My name is John above my pay grade folks. My name is John Kennedy and I have the honor of serving Kennedy and I have the honor of serving Kennedy and I have the honor of serving as your state treasurer.
And I'd like the as your state treasurer and I'd like the as your state treasurer. And I'd like the honor of serving as your Jack's, the honor of serving as your Jack's, the honor of serving as your Jack's, the United States Senator. Now I need you to United States Senator now I need you to United States.
Senator now I need you to go vote. Let me tell you my daddy go vote. Let me tell you my daddy go vote. Let me tell you my daddy World War two. He came home, but a World War two. He came home, but a World War two. He came home but a lot of young men and women and they were lot of young men and women and they were lot of young men and women and they were all young boys and girls who fought for all young boys and girls who fought for all Young boys and girls who fought for our freedom, one of which is the right to our freedom, one of which is the right to our freedom, one of which is the right to vote didn't come home, please go vote vote didn't come home.
Please go vote vote. Didn't come home. Please go vote tomorrow. And while you're there, I hope tomorrow. And while you're there, I hope tomorrow. And while you're there, I hope you'll vote for John Kennedy. We started - you'll vote for John Kennedy. We started - you'll vote for John Kennedy. We started - we started the Senate election with 24. We started the Senate election with 24. We started the Senate election with 24 candidates and now they're 2. And if you candidates and now they're 2 and if you candidates and now they're 2. And if you wind up all 24 on the stage, you couldn't wind up all 24 on the stage.
You couldn't wind up all 24 on the stage. You couldn't pick two more different than Foster pick two more different than Foster pick two more different than Foster Campbell. And John Kennedy, I've known Campbell and John Kennedy, I've known Campbell and John Kennedy, I've known - I've known mr. Campbell a long time.
He's - I've known mr. Campbell a long time. He's - I've known mr. Campbell a long time. He's the Democrat. I'm a proud Republican. He's the Democrat, I'm a proud Republican. He's the Democrat. I'm a proud Republican. He's a liberal. I'm a conservative, a liberal. I'm a conservative, a liberal. I'm a conservative.
He's supported secretary, Hillary Clinton. In fact, I don't - I don't mean to be rude. In fact, I don't - I don't mean to be rude, in fact, I don't - I don't mean to be rude, but if you took Secretary Clinton and but if you took Secretary Clinton and but if you took Secretary Clinton and turn her upside down, is sicker Foster turn Her upside down is sicker, Foster turn, her upside down is sicker, Foster Campbell to fall out of her pocket and I Campbell to fall out of her pocket and I Campbell to fall out of her pocket.
And I supported. I supported our next president supported, I supported our next president supported I supported our next president, Donald J. Trump I believe in more freedom my opponent in I believe in more freedom my opponent in I believe in more freedom. My opponent in this race believes in more free stuff.
This race believes in more free stuff. This race believes in more free stuff and he wants you to pay for it my and he wants you to pay for it my and he wants you to pay for it. My opponent in this race believes that opponent in this race believes that opponent in this race believes that government can spend the money you government can spend the money you government can spend the money you earned better than you can and I don't earned better than you Can and I don't earned better than you can and I don't agree with it.
I think the role of agree with it. I think the role of agree with it. I think the role of government is to protect its people, not government is to protect its people, not government is to protect its people, not run their lives. I ran this race, folks run their lives. I ran this race, folks run their lives.
I ran this race folks for the same reason that I think for the same reason that I think for the same reason that I think president elect, Trump ran for president, president elect, Trump ran for president, president elect, Trump ran for president, United States. I want my country back, I United States, I want my country back.
I United States, I want my country back. I think America's best days lie ahead, but think America's best days lie ahead. But think America's best days lie ahead. But not if we keep going in the direction, not if we keep going in the direction, not if we keep going in the direction that the Washington insiders have taken that the Washington insiders have taken that the Washington insiders have taken us for the past eight years.
Here's what us for the past eight years, here's what us for the past eight years. Here's what I see in America today and it's going to - I see in America today and it's going to - I see in America today and it's going to change. We have too many undeserving big change. We have too many undeserving big change.
We have too many undeserving big shots at the top, getting bailouts and shots at the top, getting bailouts and shots at the top, getting bailouts and too many undeserving people at the too many undeserving people at the too many undeserving people at the bottom, getting handouts. And the rest of bottom, getting handouts and the rest of bottom, getting handouts and the rest of us just in the middle get stuck with the us.
Just in the middle get stuck with the us just in the middle get stuck with the bill and we can't pay it anymore because bill and we can't pay it anymore because bill and we can't pay it anymore because I - health insurance has gone up. And our - I - health insurance has gone up and our - I - health insurance has gone up and our taxes have gone up.
And and - and the cost taxes have gone up and - and and the cost taxes have gone up and - and and the cost of living is don't up is, you know what of living is don't up is, you know what of living is don't up is you know What hadn't gone up is our income, but the hadn't gone up is our income, but the hadn't gone up is our income, but the times they are a-changin and help is on times they are a-changin and help is on times they are a-changin and help is on Its way its way its way and is now my pleasure and I want you to extend a warm and I want you to extend a warm and I want you to extend a warm down-home, Louisiana.
Welcome like yourens down-home, Louisiana. Welcome like yourens down-home, Louisiana. Welcome like yourens Tiger Stadium on Saturday night, my president-elect, your my president-elect, your my president-elect, your president-elect president, Louisiana's president-elect president, Louisiana's president-elect president, Louisiana's president-elect and the next president, president-elect and the next president, president-elect and the next president of the United States.
The Honorable of the United States, the Honorable of the United States, the Honorable Donald J. Trump great to be here. I learned a lot from great to be here. I learned a lot from great to be here. I learned a lot from the great state of Louisiana. Okay, the great state of Louisiana, okay, the great state of Louisiana, okay.
Believe me and you've heard me tell the, believe me and you've heard me tell the, believe me and you've heard me tell the story numerous times, I came here just at story numerous times. I came here just at story numerous times. I came here just at the end of the primer and as you know I the end of the primer and as you know I the end of the primer and as you know, I wasn't expected to win.
Can you believe wasn't expected to win, can you believe wasn't expected to win? Can you believe that Louisiana and I was here a few that Louisiana and I was here a few that Louisiana and I was here a few before and I said, what do you mean? I'm before and I said what do you mean? I'm before and I said what do you mean?
I'm not expected the crowd is incredible but not expected. The crowd is incredible, but not expected. The crowd is incredible, but some poll. You know, the polls are not some poll, you know the polls are not some poll. You know the polls are not very honest and so they said look at the very honest and so they said look at the very honest and so they said look at the society, Scott help this.
So so I came society Scott help this. So, so I came society Scott help this. So - so I came down on a Friday night to a massive down on a Friday night to a massive down on a Friday night to a massive hangar. The place was absolutely hangar, the place was absolutely hangar. The place was absolutely thousands and thousands of people, I thousands and thousands of people, I thousands and thousands of people.
I think twenty four, twenty five thousand think twenty four, twenty five thousand, think twenty four, twenty five thousand people and I left and I said you know I people and I left and I said you know I people and I left and I said you know I Think I'm gonna win this state and I won think I'm gonna win this state and I won think I'm gonna win this state and I won the state easily, right?
And then the state easily right and then the state easily, right. And then I checked on the delegates and the - I checked on the delegates and the - I checked on the delegates and the delegates were - I didn't have as many as delegates were. I didn't have as many as delegates were. I didn't have as many as people that I beat and I said this people that I beat and I said this people that I beat and I said this system is crooked.
You mean I come down, I system is crooked. You mean I come down, I system is crooked you mean I come down, I do all that work. I came down, I used one, do all that work. I came down, I used one, do all that work. I came down - I used one of the biggest hangars bigger, I don't of the biggest hangars bigger, I don't of the biggest hangars bigger.
I don't know. Maybe this one, was it this one? But know maybe this one, was it this one? But know, maybe this one was it this one, but it was a big hangar. It was a big hangar. It was a big hangar, yeah, bigger. And we have a hell of a, yeah, bigger. And we have a hell of a, yeah, bigger. And we have a hell of a crowd today, but I'll tell you we had crowd today, but I'll tell you we had crowd today, but I'll tell you we had something.
So. So what happened, I win and something. So. So what happened, I win and something. So. So what happened, I win and then a week later I'm going over the then a week later, I'm going over the - then a week later I'm going over the counter and said Louisiana and it had counter and said Louisiana and it had counter and said Louisiana and It had names ahead of me for delegates, I said names ahead of me for delegates.
I said names ahead of me for delegates. I said wait a minute, wait a minute, wait a minute. So I won this state, I got more votes. So I won this state. I got more votes, so I won this state. I got more votes than anybody by far. It wasn't even close than anybody by far. It wasn't even close than anybody by far.
It wasn't even close and the system is rigged. I said that's - and the system is rigged, I said that's - and the system is rigged, I said that's it. So you taught me and after that we it. So you taught me and after that we it. So you taught me and after that we started doing very well. We didn't let started doing very well.
We didn't let started doing very well. We didn't let that happen anymore. We didn't let that that happen anymore. We didn't let that that happen anymore. We didn't let that happen, we cut it off, we cut it off at happen, we cut it off, we cut it off at happen, we cut it off, we cut it off at the pass the pass the pass.
But I want to thank you. This is an - but I want to thank you. This is an - but I want to thank you. This is an amazing, an amazing state and tomorrow we amazing an amazing state and tomorrow we amazing an amazing state and tomorrow we need you to go to the polls and send, need you to go to the polls and send, need you to go to the polls.
And send John Kennedy to the United States Senate John Kennedy to the United States Senate John Kennedy to the United States Senate and that's why I'm down here. That's why and that's why I'm down here. That's why and that's why I'm down here. That's why I'm here is a great guy. He's a great - I'm here is a great guy.
He's a great - I'm here is a great guy. He's a great guys, a good guy. Number one, he's a good guys, a good guy. Number one, he's a good guys, a good guy. Number one, he's a good person, person, person and somebody that I've known over the - and somebody that I've known over the - and somebody that I've known over the years and he's somebody that's worked years and he's somebody that's worked years and he's somebody that's worked hard for You over the years and now the hard for you over the years and now the hard for you over the years and now the big thing we have to get the people to big thing.
We have to get the people to big thing. We have to get the people to go to the polls and if you go to the - go to the polls and if you go to the go to the polls and if you go to the polls, he's gonna win. If you don't go to polls, he's gonna win. If you don't go to polls, he's gonna win. If you don't go to the polls, he's not gonna win the polls.
He's not gonna win the polls. He's not gonna win. And if he doesn't win, I've got myself a and if he doesn't win, I've got myself a. And if he doesn't win, I've got myself a problem in Washington because you know problem in Washington because you know problem in Washington because you know we have - it's pretty close, it's pretty - we have - it's pretty close, it's pretty - we have - it's pretty close, it's pretty close.
We need John, we need John and close. We need John, we need John and close. We need John. We need John and Washington not only for the vote, we need Washington not only for the vote. We need Washington not only for the vote we need for leadership and everything else, but for leadership and everything else, but for leadership and everything else.
But if you go there, we're gonna win. If you go there, we're gonna win. If you go there, we're gonna win Kennedy's, a proven leader who's balanced Kennedy's, a proven leader who's balanced Kennedy's, a proven leader, who's balanced, which is amazing. 16 budgets we turned, which is amazing. 16 budgets we turned, which is amazing.
16 budgets. We turned millions of dollars to taxpayers. He's a millions of dollars to taxpayers. He's a millions of dollars to taxpayers. He's a tax cutter and he will be a true fighter tax cutter and he will be a true fighter tax cutter and he will be a true fighter for Louisiana in Washington. He will be a - for Louisiana in Washington.
He will be a - for Louisiana in Washington. He will be a fighter for you so important we need fighter for you so important. We need fighter for you so important. We need John Kennedy in the Senate to help enact John Kennedy in the Senate to help enact John Kennedy in the Senate to help enact our agenda, our agenda, our agenda and we have to do it our agenda on and we have to do it.
Our agenda on - and we have to do it, our agenda on behalf of the people of this state and behalf of the people of this state and behalf of the people of this state and for this country that includes for this country that includes for this country That includes protecting the Second Amendment, protecting the Second Amendment, protecting the Second Amendment.
Repealing and replacing Obamacare securing our southern border will build. Securing our southern border will build, securing our southern border will build a wall. Let's go - we're gonna build the a wall. Let's go. We're gonna build the a wall, let's go, we're gonna build the wall wall wall well, if John's not there, maybe we can't.
Well, if John's not there, maybe we can't. Well, if John's not there, maybe we can't build the wall. So now I know you're build the wall, so now I know you're build the wall. So now I know you're gonna come out, we're gonna build, this is Louisiana. We donate cards, right? We don't need the coat. And by the way, I don't need the Hat.
And by the way, I don't need the Hat. And by the way, I don't need the Hat either right, who wants a hat? All right? Nice-looking tall guy, he'll all right nice-looking tall guy. He'll all right nice-looking tall guy, he'll give it to that kid come on. We're gonna bring back our manufacturing. We're gonna bring back our manufacturing.
We're gonna bring back our manufacturing jobs, reduce taxes, big links, we're going jobs, reduce taxes, big links, we're going jobs, reduce taxes, big links. We're going to confirm our nominee to the United to confirm our nominee to the United to confirm our nominee to the United States Supreme Court electing John States Supreme Court electing John States Supreme Court electing John Kennedy will help ensure that government Kennedy will help ensure that Government Kennedy will help ensure that government stops listening to the special interests stops, listening to the special interests stops, listening to the special interests and starts delivering for the national and starts delivering for the national and starts delivering for the national interest for our country.
For our people interest for our country, for our people, interest for our country, for our people, the people that showed up to vote, the - the people that showed up to vote, the - the people that showed up to vote, the people that were forgotten people you people that Were forgotten people you people that were forgotten people, you know what I'm talking about, they were know what I'm talking about.
They were know what I'm talking about. They were forgotten folks. You're not forgotten forgotten folks. You're not forgotten forgotten folks. You're not forgotten anymore anymore anymore. Believe me, I think the Democrats are, believe me, I think the Democrats are - believe me, I think the Democrats are gonna change their game plan next time gonna change their game plan next time gonna change their game plan next time.
What do you think The Forgotten men and what do you think The Forgotten men and what do you think The Forgotten men and their Forgotten women are not forgotten, their Forgotten. Women are not forgotten their Forgotten. Women are not forgotten anymore. It's time to deliver for you. The anymore - it's time to deliver for you the anymore.
It's time to deliver for you the American people, American people, American people to help me do that. I also need you to - to help me do that. I also need you to - to help me do that. I also need you to elect Mike Johnson in the fourth elect Mike Johnson in the fourth elect Mike Johnson in the fourth District, another fighter for Louisiana District, another fighter for Louisiana District, another fighter for Louisiana.
Mike's father just passed away. Just Mike's father just passed away. Just Mike's father just passed away, just passed away, so he's in our thoughts and passed away, so he's in our thoughts and passed away. So he's in our thoughts and he's in our prayers. Very amazing he's in our prayers. Very amazing he's in our prayers.
Very amazing, horrible timing in a sense just passed horrible timing in a sense just passed horrible timing in a sense just passed away and he loves his father. I will tell away and he loves his father. I will tell away and he loves his father. I will tell you that and father was a great guy, so you that and father was a great guy.
So you that and father was a great guy. So get out there and vote for Johnson and get out there and vote for Johnson and get out there. And vote for Johnson and vote for Kennedy get out and vote vote for Kennedy get out and vote vote for Kennedy get out and vote working with these great Louisiana working with these great Louisiana working with these great Louisiana leaders, we're going to do amazing things leaders.
We're going to do amazing things leaders. We're going to do amazing things for our country. Our plan begins with for our country, our plan begins with for our country. Our plan begins with Vall structural reform to create Vall structural reform to create Vall structural reform to create millions of really good paying jobs, millions of really good paying jobs, millions of really good paying jobs.
We've lost our great jobs and you know, we've lost our great jobs and you know, we've lost our great jobs. And you know, there's gonna be a big part because there's gonna be a big part because there's gonna be a big part because you're in the energy business more than you're in the energy business more than you're in the energy business more than most Places and we're going to see refineries and - and we're going to see refineries and - and we're going to see refineries and we're gonna see pipelines and we're - we're gonna see pipelines and we're - we're gonna see pipelines and we're gonna see lots of things Happening so, so gonna see lots of things happening so so gonna see lots of things happening so so get out there and vote first on taxes, get out there and vote first on taxes, get out there and vote.
First on taxes, we're going to undertake one of the - we're going to undertake one of the - we're going to undertake one of the great tax reforms and simplifications in great tax reforms and simplifications in great tax reforms and simplifications in American history. At the center of our American history at the center of our American history at the center of our plan is massive.
Tax relief for the plan is massive. Tax relief for the plan is massive tax relief for the American middle class American middle class American middle class. We're also goes all right, you better - we're also goes all right, you better - we're also goes all right, you better believe it, right? We're also going to believe it, right.
We're also going to believe it, right. We're also going to lower our business tax rate from 35 %, all lower our business tax rate from 35 %, all lower our business tax rate from 35 % all the way down to 15 %. We're gonna start the way down to 15 %. We're gonna start the way down to 15 %. We're gonna start hiring again and we are going to make it hiring again and we are going to make it hiring again and we are going to make it not so easy when companies want to leave.
Not so easy when companies want to leave, not so easy when companies want to leave Louisiana and go to other states, go to Louisiana and go to other states, go to Louisiana and go to other states, go to other countries, go to other states. You other countries go to other states, you other countries go to other states, you know what if they do, I'm sorry, folks, you know what if they do, I'm sorry, folks, you know what if they do, I'm sorry, folks, you got ta fight for yourself, right, but They got ta fight for yourself, right, but they got ta fight for yourself, right, but they go out, they go to other countries, they go out, they go to other countries, they go out, they go to other countries, they make their product, they sell it back, make Their product, they sell it back, make their product, they sell it back through a very weak border.
We have a - through a very weak border, we have a - through a very weak border, we have a very weak border, probably the weakest, very weak border, probably the weakest. Very weak border, probably the weakest border. Does it get any weaker in the border? Does it get any weaker in the border? Does it get any weaker in the world than this?
You know we fight for world than this, you know we fight for world than this. You know, we fight for other countries so they can have a other countries so they can have a other countries so they can have a border, but we don't fight for our own border, but we don't fight for our own border, but we don't fight for our Own borders, isn't it incredible, it's borders, isn't it incredible?
It's borders, isn't it incredible? It's incredible on regulations. We're going to incredible on regulations. We're going to incredible on regulations. We're going to eliminate every single wasteful, eliminate every single wasteful, eliminate every single wasteful regulation that undermines the ability regulation that undermines the ability regulation that undermines the ability of our workers and our companies to - of our workers and our companies to - of our workers and our Companies to compete on energy you more than any compete on energy.
You more than any compete on energy. You more than any other state almost we will cancel the other state almost. We will cancel the other state almost. We will cancel the job-killing restrictions on the job-killing restrictions on the job-killing restrictions on the production of American energy, including production of American energy, including production of American energy including shale oil, natural gas and clean.
And you know, we haven't had refineries and you know we haven't had refineries and you know we haven't had refineries built in decades, right? We're gonna have built in decades, right? We're gonna have built in decades, right? We're gonna have refineries built again folks. We use refineries built again folks we use refineries built again folks, we use refineries from other countries.
I mean refineries from other countries, I mean refineries from other countries. I mean the whole thing is just crazy. It's crazy. The whole thing is just crazy. It's crazy. The whole thing is just crazy, it's crazy on infrastructure. I'll ask Congress to on infrastructure, I'll ask Congress to on infrastructure.
I'll ask Congress to pass legislation that produces one pass legislation that produces one pass legislation that produces one trillion dollars of new investments in trillion dollars of new investments in trillion dollars of new investments in America's crumbling infrastructure, America's crumbling infrastructure, America's crumbling infrastructure.
That's so true. I have a friend, he's one that's so true. I have a friend, he's one that's so true. I have a friend. He's one of the biggest truckers in the world and of the biggest truckers in the world and of the biggest truckers in the world. And he buys these very expensive trucks. I - he buys these very expensive trucks.
I - he buys these very expensive trucks. I won't give you the name, but the most won't give you the name, but the most won't give you the name, but the most expensive, most be review. So proud of it expensive, most be review, so proud of it expensive, most be review. So proud of it. The best - and he calls me not so long ago the best and he calls me not so long ago the best and he calls me not so long ago when he goes.
You know, I travel from when he goes, you know, I travel from when he goes, you know, I travel from Texas to New York, I travel from Texas to New York, I travel from Texas to New York. I travel from Louisiana to someplace. He said I come Louisiana to someplace he said I come Louisiana to someplace. He said I come back and my trucks are all busted up back and my trucks are all busted up back and my trucks are all busted up because of the roads.
I said. When did - because of the roads I said when did because of the roads I said when did that happen before, has it never happened that happen before? Has it never happened that happen before? Has it never happened? He says never been like this. They're all - he says never been like this. They're all - he says never been like this.
They're all busted up and he said he's gonna buy busted up and he said he's gonna buy busted up. And he said he's gonna buy cheap trucks from now. On - so I guess cheap trucks from now on, so I guess cheap trucks from now on. So I guess that's - we want to - we want them to buy that's we want to - we want them to buy, that's we want to - we want them to buy the better trucks.
We want to fix up our - the better trucks. We want to fix up our - the better trucks. We want to fix up our infrastructure, Bigley infrastructure, Bigley infrastructure, Bigley that includes and who's better at that, that includes and who's better at that, that includes and who's better at that stuff than me.
Believe me. And hey, I don't stuff than me, believe me and hey, I don't stuff than me. Believe me and hey, I don't need your vote anymore, but I'm totally a need your vote anymore, but I'm totally a need your vote anymore. But I'm totally a very good, very good, very good. So I don't need your vote. Can you - so I don't need your vote.
Can you - so I don't need your vote. Can you imagine that for years on the - you vote, imagine that for years on the - you vote, imagine that for years on the you vote, but nobody's better at that. That's what - but nobody's better at that. That's what - but nobody's better at that. That's what I do. But it just made a big impression, I do, but it just made a big impression.
I do, but it just made a big impression. You know, when he told me this, it said, you know, when he told me this, it said, you know, when he told me this, it said, yeah, but I asked him when, what did it? Yeah, but I asked him when, what did it? Yeah, but I asked him when - what did it used to be said, never been like this used to be said never been like this used to be said never been like this.
Never new projects were going to do new, never new projects were going to do new. Never new projects were going to do new projects for both rural communities and projects for both rural communities and projects for both rural communities and our inner cities. And that's been our inner cities and that's been our inner cities and that's been forgotten too.
If you think the inner forgotten too, if you think the inner forgotten too, if you think the inner cities have been forgotten also not any cities have been forgotten also not any cities have been forgotten also not any longer, longer, longer. And we will put our people back to work and we will put our people back to work and we will put our people back to work in the process.
Our people. It's time to in the process our people, it's time to in the process our people. It's time to get help for the American people and we get help for the American people and we get help for the American people and we are going to get people off of welfare are going to get people off of welfare are going to get people off Of welfare and they're gonna want to work, we're - and they're gonna want to work, we're and they're gonna want to work.
We're gonna get them into the labor market and gonna get them into the labor market and gonna get them into the labor market. And they're gonna do a great job and they're - they're gonna do a great job and they're - they're gonna do a great job and they're gonna make good money, much more money, gonna make good money, much more money, gonna make good money.
Much more money than they ever made before and we're than they ever made before and we're than they ever made before. And we're gonna rebuild our country with American gonna rebuild our country with American gonna rebuild our country with American hands by American workers. Okay, my hands by American workers, okay, my hands by American workers, okay.
My administration will follow two simple administration will follow. Two simple administration will follow two simple rules by American and hire American, okay, rules by American and hire American, okay, rules by American and hire American. Okay, because from now on, it's going to be because from now on, it's going to be because from now on it's going to be America first America, first America, first America, first America, first America first, our trade deficit is now nearly 800. Our trade deficit is now nearly 800. Our trade deficit is now nearly 800 billion dollars a year.
Can you believe billion dollars a year? Can you believe billion dollars a year? Can you believe that that that who's doing this, do you have any who's doing this? Do you have any who's doing this? Do you have any business people in the audience? Do you business people in the audience? Do you business people in the audience?
Do you think you might - do you think you might think you might - do you think you might think you might - do you think you might be able to negotiate a slightly better - be able to negotiate a slightly better - be able to negotiate a slightly better deal than The 800 billion we make all deal than the 800 billion we make all deal than the 800 billion.
We make all these wonderful trade deals, these wonderful trade deals, these wonderful trade deals. I love tread and I love free trade, but I love tread and I love free trade, but I love tread and I love free trade, but right now we have foolish trade. We have right now we have foolish trade. We have right now we have foolish trade.
We have okay ready, we have stupid trade, stupid, okay, ready. We have stupid trade, stupid, okay, ready. We have stupid trade, stupid play dumb. It's a chronic drag on growth, play dumb. It's a chronic drag on growth, play dumb. It's a chronic drag on growth and a destroyer of jobs and the wealth and a destroyer of jobs and the wealth and a destroyer of jobs and the wealth of our country.
And you see what's of our country and you see what's of our country and you see what's happening. We are 20 trillion dollars happening. We are 20 trillion dollars happening. We are 20 trillion dollars that is going up rapidly. That is going up rapidly. That is going up rapidly. That's why we'll renegotiate our trade.
That's why we'll renegotiate our trade. That's why we'll renegotiate our trade deals, stop the product dumping and the deals, stop the product dumping and the deals stop the product dumping and the currency manipulation, which is a currency manipulation which is a currency manipulation which is a disaster for our country.
Every time we disaster for our country, every time we disaster for our country, every time we get going China and others, they just get going. China and others, they just get going. China and others, they just knocked the hell out of the value of knocked the hell out of the value of knocked the hell out of the value of their currency.
And we have to go back their currency and we have to go back their currency. And we have to go back and back and it just doesn't work folks and back and it just doesn't work folks and back. And it just doesn't work folks and defend. We're going to defend every and defend we're going to defend every and defend we're going to defend every last American job.
You know, they would last American job, you know, they would last American job, you know, they would did a big report. How come Trump won by did a big report, how come Trump won by did a big report, how come Trump won by so much. Remember there was no way he so much. Remember there was no way he. So much - remember there was no way he gets to 270, right?
The electoral college gets to 270, right? The electoral college gets to 270, right, the electoral college which - which is amazing because you have which - which is amazing because you have which which is amazing because you have to go to all these states that it was an to go to all these states that it Was an to go to all these states that it was an amazing, amazing experience, but there's amazing, amazing experience, but there's amazing, amazing experience.
But there's no way I get to 270 and I'm saying, Wow, no way I get to 270. And I'm saying, Wow, no way I get to 270. And I'm saying, Wow. In fact, I went to the state of Maine. In fact, I went to the state of Maine, in fact, I went to the state of Maine four times because I needed one because four times because I needed one because four times because I needed one, because I was at 269, I needed until the election.
I was at 269, I needed until the election, I was at 269, I needed until the election game. And then boy, did we blast by that game and then, boy, did we blast by that game and then, boy, did we blast by that 270, right? 270, right? 270 right, 306, 306 and I guess they did a recount 306 306 and I guess they did a recount 306 306 and I guess they did a recount in Wisconsin and after I think 70 or 80 in Wisconsin and after I think 70 or 80 in Wisconsin.
And after I think 70 or 80 percent, somebody, I think we picked up 32 percent, somebody, I think we picked up 32 percent. Somebody, I think we picked up 32 votes, all these millions and millions of votes, all these millions and millions of votes, all these millions. And millions of votes, I think we picked up picked up votes.
I think we picked up picked up votes. I think we picked up picked up about 30 and if a company wants to fire about 30 and if a company wants to fire about 30 and if a company wants to fire their workers, leave our country and then their workers leave our country and then their Workers leave our country and then ship their products back in there will ship their products back in there will ship their products back in.
There will be consequences including a very, very be consequences including a very, very be consequences including a very, very substantial tax. In other words, look substantial tax, in other words, look substantial tax. In other words, look, there's no tax, there's no tax, somebody, there's no tax, there's no tax, somebody, there's no tax, there's no tax.
Somebody said, you know, these reporters, these guys said, you know, these reporters, these guys said, you know, these reporters, these guys, their business reporters. The one thing we have done, we have the one thing we have done, we have the one thing we have done, we have exposed the credibility, the press, they exposed the credibility, the press, they exposed, the credibility, the press, they have the lowest credibility and our popularity.
I say our - because and our popularity, I say our - because and our popularity, I say our - because this is a movement that we're all of this is a movement that we're all of this is a movement that we're all of this thing together. We're all in this. This thing together, we're all in this, this thing together, we're all in this together, but we are shooting up, we're together but we are shooting up, we're together but we are shooting up.
We're like a rocket ship, right, maybe because I like a rocket ship right, maybe because I like a rocket ship right, maybe because I don't like 4.2 billion dollar aircraft, don't like 4.2 billion dollar aircraft, don't like 4.2 billion dollar aircraft. Somebody said how much is that gonna, somebody said how much is that gonna, somebody said how much is that gonna cost 4.2 billion, I said 4.2 billion, I cost 4.2 billion, I said 4.2 billion, I cost 4.2 billion, I said 4.2 billion.
I think we'll do it for a little bit less, think we'll do it for a little bit less, think we'll do it for a little bit less. Don't you agree? Don't you agree? Don't you agree like maybe billions less, okay? But yeah, like maybe billions less, okay. But yeah, like maybe billions less, okay. But yeah, we're going - we're going very rapidly up, we're going - we're going very rapidly up, we're going - we're going very rapidly up, but we're gonna because it's common, but we're gonna because it's common, but we're gonna because it's common sense, sense, sense.
We don't want companies to leave our - we don't want companies to leave our - we don't want companies to leave our country, go to another country and sell country, go to another country and sell country, go to another country and sell their product and didn't sell the their Product and didn't sell the their product and didn't sell the product where they left.
Now we have all product where they left now we have all product where they left now. We have all unemployed people. They had jobs for 32 unemployed people. They had jobs for 32 unemployed people. They had jobs for 32 years. I mean, Kerry is a great example years. I mean, Kerry is a great example years.
I mean, Kerry is a great example. And Kerry or we did a great job with and Kerry or we did a great job with and Kerry or we did a great job with Kerry, but you know they announced a year, Kerry, but you know they announced a year, Kerry, but you know they announced A year and a half ago, they already have a plant and a half ago they already have a plant and a half ago they already have a plant built.
I mean, think of what you could do built. I mean, think of what you could do built. I mean, think of what you could do if they haven't started or if they - if they haven't started or if they - if they haven't started or if they haven't said anything yet, they're not - haven't said anything yet, they're not - haven't said anything yet, they're not gonna Leave because we're gonna put up a gonna leave because we're gonna put up a gonna leave because we're gonna put up a very high tax and if they want to build very high tax and if they want to build very high tax And if they want to build their plant outside of this country, their plant outside of this country, their plant outside of this country, that's fine.
But if they think they're, that's fine. But if they think they're, that's fine. But if they think they're going to sell their product back into going to sell their product back into going to sell their product back into the country and have no tax, that's not the country and have no tax, that's not the country and have no tax.
That's not gonna happen anymore, folks not gonna gonna happen anymore, folks not gonna gonna happen anymore, folks not gonna happen and therefore they're not gonna happen and therefore they're not gonna happen and therefore they're not gonna leave. Now they may leave a state and go leave now they may leave a state and go leave.
Now they may leave a state and go to a different state. They may leave you to a different state. They may leave you to a different state. They may leave, you know, maybe they're having a hard time know, maybe they're having a hard time know, maybe they're having a hard time with their employees. That's possible and with their employees that's possible and with their employees, that's possible and they may leave, but they're gonna leave.
They may leave, but they're gonna leave. They may leave, but they're gonna leave for another state. They're not leaving for another state. They're not leaving for another state. They're not leaving for another country very easily. And if for another country very easily and if for another country very easily and if they do, they're going to have a very - they do.
They're going to have a very - they do. They're going to have a very, very substantial tariff or tax to pay very substantial tariff or tax to pay very substantial tariff or tax to pay. That's it. That's it. That's it. And you know what's gonna happen? They're - and you know what's gonna happen, they're - and you know what's gonna happen, they're gonna say we like Louisiana very much gonna say we like Louisiana very much gonna say we like Louisiana very much, right?
We're not leaving, right? We're not leaving, right, we're not leaving, I don't say a hundred percent of the - I don't say a hundred percent of the - I don't say a hundred percent of the time, but I'll tell you why pretty close time. But I'll tell you why pretty close time. But I'll tell you why pretty close to that number, it's gonna be pretty to that number, it's gonna be pretty to that number, it's gonna be pretty close and we have - we lost seventy close and we have - we lost seventy close and we have - We lost seventy thousand factories in this country.
We thousand factories in this country. We thousand factories in this country. We have so many companies right now have so many companies right now have so many companies right now. Although I think probably if I would, although I think probably if I would, although I think probably if I would have said a couple of months ago, we have have said a couple of months ago, we have have said a couple of months ago, we have so Many companies negotiating to leave, I so many companies negotiating to leave.
I so many companies negotiating to leave. I don't think they're negotiating so fast. Don't think they're negotiating so fast, don't think they're negotiating so fast right now. I've heard that and you see right now, I've heard that and you see right now, I've heard that and you see what's happening with the stock market, what's happening with the stock market, what's happening with the stock market and a lot of things because they - and a Lot of things because they and a lot of things because they understand we know what we're doing, understand we know what we're doing, understand we know what we're doing.
We're not gonna let this happen. We can't - we're not gonna let this happen. We can't - we're not gonna let this happen. We can't let it happen. Our - our country is being let it happen. Our - our country is being let it happen. Our - our country is being drained, drained of its jobs and it's drained, drained of its jobs and it's drained drained of its jobs and it's good jobs and they're going to other good jobs and they're going to other good jobs and they're going to other countries.
And it's just not going to countries and it's just not going to countries and it's just not going to happen on the military. We will rebuild happen on the military. We will rebuild happen on the military. We will rebuild our badly depleted military service, our badly depleted military service. Our badly depleted military service members have equipment and training members have equipment and training.
Members have equipment and training, technology and resources. Everything. They technology and resources, everything they technology and resources, everything they need to get the job done. Now hopefully need to get the job done. Now hopefully need to get the job done. Now hopefully we will never have to use that great.
We will never have to use that great. We will never have to use that great power that we're going to build. We are power that we're going to build. We are power that we're going to build. We are going to build the strongest military going to build. The strongest military going to build the strongest military that we've ever had and there have been that we've ever had.
And there have been that we've ever had. And there have been a few times when our country has needed a few times when our country has needed a few times when our country has needed it to this extent. But I believe in peace it to this extent. But I believe in peace it to this extent, but I believe in peace through strength, you know, you look at through strength, you know, you look at through strength, you know, you look at some of these other countries, what some of these other countries, what some of These other countries, what they're doing, what they're building and they're doing what they're building and they're doing what they're building.
And you know what, when they see what we're, you know what, when they see what we're - you know what, when they see what we're gonna do, they're gonna call and I'm gonna do, they're gonna call and I'm gonna do, they're gonna Call and I'm gonna have great relationships with gonna have great relationships with gonna have great relationships with China and Russia and all of them and China and Russia and all of them and China and Russia and all of them.
And they're gonna call this a, you know, they're gonna call this a, you know, they're gonna call this a, you know you've to it. A lot of building is there. You've to it a lot of building is there, you've to it a lot of building. Is there any way we can sort of ease it up a, any way we can sort of ease it up a any way we can sort of ease it up a little bit?
I'm okay with that little bit. I'm okay with that little bit. I'm okay with that, but they have to ease it up. They're - but they have to ease it up. They're - but they have to ease it up. They're not easing it up. If you look at what's not easing it up, if you look at what's not easing it up, if you look at what's going on in China, if you look at what's going on in China, if you look at what's going on in China, if you look at What's going on in so many other countries going on in so many other countries going on in so many other countries, they're not easing up.
And if they're not, they're not easing up. And if they're not, they're not easing up. And if they're not easing up, we're not easing up, okay. At the same time, we will ensure our - at the same time, we will ensure our - at the same time, we will ensure our veterans have the best medical care. Veterans have the best medical care veterans have the best medical care anywhere in the world, anywhere in the world anywhere in the world.
We will honor those who have served this. We will honor those who have served this. We will honor those who have served this country and that includes respecting and country and that includes respecting and country and that includes respecting and defending the American flag. Frankly when defending the American flag.
Frankly, when defending the American flag, frankly, when I see people ripping up the American, I see people ripping up the American. I see people ripping up the American flag like that flag beautiful when I see flag like that, flag beautiful. When I see flag like that, flag beautiful, when I see - I think it's a disgrace, okay?
And you can - I think it's a disgrace, okay? And you can - I think it's a disgrace, okay. And you can say what you want free speech, that's all, say what you want free speech, that's all, say what you want free speech, that's all wonderful. Everything's one. If I'm a big, wonderful, everything's one. If I'm a big, wonderful, everything's one.
If I'm a big believer in free speech, but maybe we're believer in free speech, but maybe we're believer in free speech. But maybe we're gonna be putting something in to see if gonna be putting something in to see if gonna be putting something in to see if we can do something about it. Because we can do something about it.
Because we can do something about it because this is a special case. And when I see this is a special case and when I see this is a special case and when I see people burning the American flag and people burning the American flag and people burning the American flag and then stepping on it as it's burning up, then Stepping on it, as it's burning up, then stepping on it as it's burning up and then stomping on it and stepping on and then stomping on it and stepping on and then stomping on it and stepping on it on the ground it on the ground it.
On the ground, I don't think - I don't think in the - I - I don't think - I don't think in the - I - I don't think - I don't think in the - I don't think I remember that when I was - don't think I remember that when I was - don't think. I remember that when I was going to set right, how many of you guys going to set, right, how many of you guys going to set, right?
How many of you guys are young? Like me, remember when we were - are young like me, remember when we were - are young like me, remember when we were very young, I don't remember that very young. I don't remember that very young. I don't remember that happening. So we're gonna have to, I think happening.
So we're gonna have to, I think happening. So we're gonna have to - I think we're gonna have to do something about we're gonna have to do something about we're gonna have to do something about that. On crime, the murder rate has that on crime, the murder rate has that on crime. The murder rate has experienced its largest increase in 45, experienced its largest increase in 45, experienced its largest increase in 45 years.
The press doesn't tell you that years. The press doesn't tell you that years. The press doesn't tell you that we're going to support the incredible we're going to support the incredible we're going to support the incredible men and women of law enforcement and men and women of law enforcement and men and women of law enforcement.
And we're going to bring this terrible crime, we're going to bring this terrible crime, we're going to bring this terrible crime. Then on immigration, we will build a then on immigration, we will build a then on immigration. We will build a great wall and we will put it into great wall and we will put it into great wall and we will put it into illegal immigration and stop the drugs illegal immigration and stop the drugs illegal immigration and stop the drugs from pouring into Our country also we've from pouring into our country also we've from pouring into our country also we've become a drug den during this campaign.
I become a drug den during this campaign I become a drug den. During this campaign, I had a chance to meet the amazing - had a chance to meet the amazing had a chance to meet the amazing families of the remembrance project. Families of the remembrance project, families of the remembrance project, parents whose children were killed by parents whose children were killed by parents whose children were killed by illegal immigrants, a trump illegal immigrants, a trump illegal immigrants, a trump administration will end.
This long administration will end this long administration will end this long nightmare of violence and that's what it nightmare of violence and that's what it nightmare of violence and that's what it is, is, is it's a nightmare of violence. We will - it's a nightmare of violence. We will - it's a nightmare of violence.
We will fight to protect every American life fight to protect every American life fight to protect every American life during the campaign. I also spent time during the campaign. I also spent time during the campaign. I also spent time with American workers who were laid off with American workers who were laid off with American workers who were laid off and forced to train our own workers and forced to train our own workers and forced to train our own workers.
Brought in to replace them, we're not brought in to replace them. We're not brought in to replace them. We're not going to let that happen anymore. Folks going to let that happen anymore. Folks going to let that happen anymore. Folks, they're forced to train people. They were - they're forced to train people, they were - they're forced to train people.
They were laid off. They've been at different laid off. They've been at different laid off. They've been at different places for 30 years, more less and places for 30 years, more less and places for 30 years more less. And they're forced to train. If you don't, they're forced to train. If you don't, they're forced to train.
If you don't train them, we're not giving you any train them. We're not giving you any train them. We're not giving you any severance, not gonna happen because severance not gonna happen because severance not gonna happen because that's actually the meaning, it's not - that's actually the meaning, it's not - that's actually the meaning, it's not gonna happen one of my first executive Gon na happen one of my first executive gonna happen, one of my first executive orders will be to ask the Department of orders will be to ask the Department of orders will be to ask the Department of Labor to investigate all visa abuses Labor to investigate All visa abuses Labor to investigate all visa abuses that undermine jobs and wages for the - that undermine jobs and wages for the - that undermine jobs and wages for the American worker.
This is about our American worker. This is about our American worker. This is about our country now. This is about our country country. Now this is about our country country. Now this is about our country. You know, I've studied a lot of the trade. You know, I've studied a lot of the trade. You know, I've studied a lot of the trade deals over the last few months.
I love deals over the last few months. I love deals over the last few months. I love reading this stuff. I don't know reading this stuff. I don't know reading this stuff. I don't know something strange up there when I want something strange up there when I want something strange up there when I want. But we have the worst deals I looked at, but we have the worst deals I looked at.
But we have the worst deals. I looked at trade deals that were made with Mexico trade deals that were made with Mexico trade deals that were made with Mexico, the worst deal made with all of Mexico, the worst deal made with all of Mexico, the worst deal made with all of Mexico. So they made a lot of deals, not just us.
So they made a lot of deals, not just us. So they made a lot of deals, not just us, not just NAFTA, which is a disaster. They not just NAFTA, which is a disaster. They not just NAFTA, which is a disaster. They made a lot of deals. We have the worst, made a lot of deals. We have the worst, made a lot of deals.
We have the worst deal made by any country, nowhere by far deal made by any country. Nowhere by far deal made by any country, nowhere by far the biggest would blow everything away. The biggest would blow everything away. The biggest would blow everything away, but we have the worst deal made by any, but we have the worst deal made by any.
But we have the worst deal made by any country and it was effective from the country and it was effective from the country and it was effective from the time it was done because of the VAT tax time it was done because of the VAT tax time. It was done because of the VAT tax. They didn't really take it into account.
They didn't really take it into account. They didn't really take it into account. It's complicated. It doesn't matter, but it's complicated. It doesn't matter. But it's complicated. It doesn't matter. But it was defective and for decades, nobody - it was defective. And for decades, nobody - it was defective.
And for decades, nobody changed it because they were too lazy or changed it because they were too lazy or changed it because they were too lazy or they didn't want to do it or they didn't. They didn't want to do it or they didn't. They didn't want to do it or they didn't understand, understand, understand.
But for years that deal was defective, but for years that deal was defective. But for years that deal was defective. It's not going to be defective anymore. It's not going to be defective anymore. It's not going to be defective anymore to protect our country from terrorism to protect our country from terrorism.
To protect our country from terrorism experiment, we will suspend immigration experiment. We will suspend immigration experiment. We will suspend immigration from regions where it cannot be safely from regions where it cannot be safely from regions where it cannot be safely processed or veteran. And we have people coming into our - and we have people coming into our - and we have people coming into our country by the thousands, thousands and country by the thousands, thousands and country by the thousands, thousands and thousands of people.
And now I don't have thousands of people and now I don't have thousands of people and now I don't have to campaign. So I don't have to say and to campaign. So I don't have to say and to campaign. So I don't have to say and Hillary's going to increase it by five Hillary's going to increase it by five Hillary's going to increase it by five hundred and fifty percent other, no, I hundred and fifty percent other, no, I hundred and fifty percent other.
No, I don't have to say it anymore, but - but don't have to say it anymore, but - but don't have to say it anymore. But - but think of it we have people coming in by - think of it. We have people coming in by - think of it. We have people coming in by the tens of thousands and look folks, we the tens of thousands and look folks, we the tens of thousands and look folks, we have enough problems.
We have enough, have enough problems, we have enough have enough problems, we have enough problems. We can't do this. We're gonna problems, we can't do this. We're gonna problems. We can't do this. We're gonna build safe zones. We're gonna have build safe zones. We're gonna have build safe zones. We're gonna have certain areas, the Gulf states, tremendous certain areas, the Gulf states, tremendous certain areas, the Gulf states tremendous amounts of money.
Thank you. Darling. I amounts of money. Thank you, darling. I amounts of money. Thank you, darling. I love her too, but I get in trouble if I love her too. But I get in trouble if I love her too. But I get in trouble if I say that. So I'm not gonna sign, but we're say that. So I'm not gonna sign. But we're say that - so I'm not gonna sign, but we're gonna have people from the Gulf states, gonna have people from the Gulf states, gonna have people from the Gulf states, the Gulf states themselves, they're gonna, the Gulf states themselves, they're gon Na, the Gulf states themselves, they're gonna pay for it.
They gonna pay for it. They pay for it. They gonna pay for it, they pay for it. They gonna pay for it. They have nothing but money they're not doing have nothing but money. They're not doing - have nothing but money. They're not doing what they're supposed to be doing and what they're supposed to be doing and what they're supposed to be doing.
And they're fine, they're going to pay for it. They're fine. They're going to pay for it. They're fine. They're going to pay for it. We're not gonna pay for twenty trillion. We're not gonna pay for twenty trillion. We're not gonna pay for twenty trillion dollars, but we want to make homes for dollars, but we want to make homes for dollars.
But we want to make homes for these people because it's a tragedy the - these people because it's a tragedy the - these people because it's a tragedy, the migration and it started, you know why it migration and it started, you know why it migration and it started. You know why it started, I don't have to go to it.
I don't started. I don't have to go to it. I don't started. I don't have to go to it. I don't have gone through it. We're not running have gone through it. We're not running - have gone through it, we're not running for office, but that nice to say we're for office, but that nice to say we're for office, but that nice to say we're not running for office.
I don't have to not running for office. I don't have to - not running for office. I don't have to go through all the reasons. The fact is go through all the reasons. The fact is go through all the reasons. The fact is it's all - it's a human tragedy and we're - it's all - it's a human tragedy and we're - it's all - it's a human tragedy and we're gonna help it.
We're gonna help it. But gonna help it, we're gonna help it. But gonna help it, we're gonna help it, but that doesn't mean we're gonna allow. That doesn't mean we're gonna allow. That doesn't mean we're gonna allow people to come into our country, some of people to come into our country, some of people to come into our country, some of whom have evil intentions and you see in whom have evil intentions and you see in whom have Evil intentions and you see in Ohio State, I was there the other day and Ohio State, I was there the other day and Ohio State I was there the other day and great people.
The damage done by one great people, the damage done by one great people. The damage done by one person, you look at so many different person. You look at so many different person. You look at so many different places, San Bernardino and I mean look at places San Bernardino and I mean look at places San Bernardino and I mean look at the World Trade Center, look at what the World Trade Center look at, what the World Trade Center look At what happened in Orlando, this so such evil happened in Orlando, this so such evil happened in Orlando this so such evil spirit, evil intention, we have other spirit evil intention, we have other spirit evil intention, we have other problems.
We have to solve many, many problems. We have to solve many, many problems. We have to solve many, many problems and you know we've spent now problems and you know we've spent now problems and you know we've spent now six trillion dollars in the Middle East, six trillion dollars in the Middle East, six trillion dollars in the Middle East.
Think of it six trillion and yet we got think of it six trillion and yet we got think of it six trillion and yet we got nothing, you know we have, we got nothing, nothing you know we have. We got nothing, nothing you know we have - we got nothing says what do we get out of it, nothing says what do we get out of it, nothing says what do we get out of it?
Nothing, you know, we got out of it, death we got, you know, we got out of it, death we got, you know, we got out of it, death, we got destruction, we have - we have all this destruction. We have - we have all this destruction we have - we have all this money that we are. It's the whole thing money that we are - it's the whole thing money that we are - it's the whole thing is crazy.
With that being said, we have to is crazy with that being said, we have to is crazy. With that being said, we have to stop Isis. We have to knock them out afternoon. We'll do that. I'll say general afternoon we'll do that. I'll say general afternoon, we'll do that. I'll say general, mad dog matters. He's great.
He's great mad dog matters. He's great. He's great mad dog matters. He's great. He's great. He's a great guy. He's a great guy. He's a great guy, today's a great guy. And we have - we have today's a great guy and we have - we have today's a great guy and we have - we have another great person going to be named another great person, going to be named another great person going to be named, not a lot of them.
But in terms of what - not a lot of them, but in terms of what - not a lot of them. But in terms of what we're talking about, we're talking about - we're talking about next week, somebody that you're gonna next week, somebody that you're gonna next week, somebody that you're gonna have tremendous respect for.
Also a trump have tremendous respect for also a trump have tremendous respect for also a trump administration will always put - the administration will always put the administration will always put the safety and security of the American safety and security of the American safety and security of the American people first ethics reform will be a people first ethics reform will be a people first ethics reform will be a crucial part of our 100-day plan as well crucial part of our 100-day plan as well crucial part of our 100-day plan as well.
We're going to drain the swamp of - we're going to drain the swamp of - we're going to drain the swamp of corruption in Washington DC, drain the corruption in Washington DC, drain the corruption in Washington DC drain the swamp. Thank you. It always amazes me. You know, thank you. It always amazes me. You know, thank you.
It always amazes me. You know here we are at a Friday instead of a - here we are at a Friday instead of a here we are at a Friday instead of a crazy time of the day, right, how many crazy time of the day, right? How many crazy time of the day, right, how many people show up for these things, right? People show up for these things, right?
People show up for these things, right? That's what I knew. By the way, people, that's what I knew by the way people, that's what I knew. By the way, people asked when did you know, you know, I was asked when did you know, you know, I was asked when did you know, you know I was campaign always had these big crowds, but campaign always had these big crowds.
But campaign always had these big crowds, but that last month was unbelievable. The - that last month was unbelievable. The - that last month was unbelievable. The crowds who a mess of, we're taking crowds who a mess of. We're taking crowds who a mess of. We're taking stadiums. They were packing them in and stadiums, they were packing them in and stadiums, they were packing them in and when they had a higher entertainment when they had a higher entertainment when they had a higher entertainment, because people I said, I don't know if because people I Said I don't know if - because people I said, I don't know if that means anything, but I think it does that means anything.
But I think it does that means anything, but I think it does. And then we won Pennsylvania and we won and then we won Pennsylvania and we won and then we won Pennsylvania and we won Michigan, we won Wisconsin, we won all Michigan, we won Wisconsin, we won all Michigan, we won Wisconsin. We won all these different places.
It's a beautiful - these different places, it's a beautiful - these different places. It's a beautiful thing to say. I will say that the spirit thing to say, I will say that the spirit thing to say, I will say that the spirit of what we've all done together is of what we've all done together is of what we've all done together is incredible.
And - and you'll see - thank you, incredible. And - and you'll see - thank you, incredible. And - and you'll see - thank you and you'll see - you'll see a lot of - and you'll see - you'll see a lot of - and you'll see - you'll see a lot of things happen. A lot of it's common sense things happen, a lot of it's common sense.
Things happen. A lot of it's common sense to be honest with you. A lot of it's just to be honest with you, a lot of - it's just to be honest with you, a lot of it's just common says a lot of the people that common says a lot of the people that common says a lot of the people that Voted where they're great people, they voted where they're great people, they voted where they're great people, they love the country, but they haven't voted love the country, but they haven't voted love the country, but they haven't voted in 20 years, 30 years, boy, did they vote in 20 years, 30 years, boy, did they vote in 20 years, 30 years?
Boy, did they vote? Boy, did they vote? But they, you know, they, boy, did they vote. But they, you know, they, boy, did they vote. But they, you know, they come in here. People that have never come in here, people that have never come in here, people that have never voted in some cases and yet they're voted in some cases and yet they're voted in some cases.
And yet they're great people and they're hard-working great people and they're hard-working great people and they're hard-working. And they're, you know, but they just never and they're, you know, but they just never and they're, you know, but they just never saw the person they went to vote. And now saw the person, they went to vote and now saw the person they went to vote and now they come down and they have Trump, they come down and they have Trump, they come down and they have Trump shirts.
So in Trump hats, their buttons go. Folks, what I'm hearing is that everyone, folks, what I'm hearing is that everyone, folks, what I'm hearing is that everyone has lost the audio. It's not exclusive to has lost the audio. It's not exclusive to has lost the audio. It's not exclusive to us. There are people here, we go up, they us - there are people here, we go up, they us - there are people here, we go up, they came back for a minute, came back for a minute, came back for a minute.
We're working on it here. It's not a - we're working on it here. It's not a - we're working on it here. It's not a problem exclusive to us. Apparently the problem exclusive to us, apparently the problem exclusive to us, apparently the master audio is cut. I was trying to get master audio is cut, I was trying to get master audio is cut.
I was trying to get it back as soon as possible it back as soon as possible it back as soon as possible standby. Okay. So the pool feet has audio which is okay. So the pool feet has audio which is okay. So the pool feet has audio, which is the stream that you probably are seeing the stream that you probably are seeing the stream that you probably are seeing all over YouTube that's being stolen.
But all over YouTube that's being stolen. But all over YouTube that's being stolen. But as far as us goes and the rest of the - as far as us goes and the rest of the - as far as us goes and the rest of the media, we've lost it because we're going media. We've lost it because we're going media. We've lost it because we're going out of the mold box and they're working out of the mold box and they're working out of the mold box and they're working on the problem right now.
As you can see on the problem right now, as you can see on the problem right now, as you can see right before our eyes, I'm pretty for a right before our eyes, I'm pretty for a right before our eyes. I'm pretty - for a company with yes, that product that makes company with, yes, that product that makes company with yes, that product that makes sense because I'm sure it's never happened.
I'm - because I'm sure it's never happened. I'm - because I'm sure it's never happened. I'm sure it's never ever happened in the sure it's never ever happened in the sure it's never ever happened in the history of our country. But I can see history of our country, but I can see history of our country. But I can see somebody approving a deal that they - somebody approving a deal that they - somebody approving a deal that they shouldn't approve and then getting maybe shouldn't approve.
And then getting - maybe shouldn't approve and then getting maybe prior to that approval, right, look, he's prior to that approval, right? Look, he's prior to that approval, right? Look, he's taken is that this guy's a great taken is that this guy's a great taken is that this guy's a great businessman, he say absolute right 100 businessman, he say absolute right 100 businessman, he say absolute right 100 percent.
They're saying, hey, listen, we'd percent, they're saying, hey, listen, we'd percent, they're saying, hey, listen, we'd love you to work for the company by the love you to work for the company by the love you to work for the company. By the way, yeah, let's finish up this order we way - yeah, let's finish up this order we way - yeah, let's finish up this order.
We want you to work for the company after want you to work for the company after want you to work for the company. After you're finished, like how about next year, you're finished, like how about next year you're finished, like how about next year, how about next month? Let's get this. How about next month?
Let's get this. How about next month? Let's get this finished. So then all of a sudden you get finished, so then all of a sudden you get finished. So then all of a sudden you get stuck with a horrible contract and these stuck with a horrible contract and these stuck with a horrible contract and these people go off even if it's two years or people go off even if it's two years or people go Off even if it's two years or five years, I don't think they should five years, I don't think they should five years.
I don't think they should ever be allowed to work for these ever be allowed to work for these ever be allowed to work for these companies. And if they take the job and companies and if they take the job and companies and if they take the job and they know that it's fair, but I'll bet they know that it's fair, but I'll bet they know that it's fair.
But I'll bet you would see a big, big difference. You would see a big, big difference. You would see a big, big difference because the - the purchasing in this, because the - the purchasing in this, because the - the purchasing in this country is totally out of control for country is totally out of control for country, is totally out of control for everything.
Not only military for everything, not only military for everything, not only military for everything. I had that idea yesterday, I everything I had that idea yesterday, I everything I had that idea yesterday. I have a little idea. You know, you get have a little idea. You know you get have a little idea, you know, you get ideas when you're in business, but you ideas when you're in business, but you ideas when you're in business, but you get ideas as you go along.
But I just saw get ideas as you go along. But I just saw get ideas as you go along. But I just saw and I never saw numbers like this, the - and I never saw numbers like this. The - and I never saw numbers like this, the mass of the massive numbers of overruns, mass of the massive numbers of overruns, mass of the massive numbers of overruns, cost overruns, it bears no relationship cost overruns, it bears no relationship cost overruns.
It bears no relationship to the original contract. So I think to the original contract. So I think to the original contract. So I think we're gonna have to think - I think it - we're gonna have to think. I think it - we're gonna have to think. I think it might be a lot more important than what might be a lot more important than what might be a lot more important than what we're talking about even with the - we're talking about even with the - we're talking about even with the lobbyists, okay.
Does that make sense to lobbyists? Okay. Does that make sense to lobbyists? Okay. Does that make sense to the business people? So we face many the business people, so we face many the business people, so we face many challenges, but this is truly an exciting challenges. But this is truly an exciting challenges, but this is truly an exciting time to be alive.
The script is not yet time to be alive. The script is not yet time to be alive. The script is not yet written. We do not know what the pain written. We do not know what the pain written. We do not know what the pain will read tomorrow, except for those very will read tomorrow, except for those very will read tomorrow, except for those very young people, right?
They're gonna be young people, right? They're gonna be young people, right? They're gonna be happy, you're gonna be very, very happy, happy. You're gonna be very, very happy, happy. You're gonna be very, very happy. The young ones, huh? We're gonna make sure the young ones, huh? We're gonna make sure the young ones, huh?
We're gonna make sure. I think if we had a different result, I think if we had a different result, I think if we had a different result, they wouldn't have been so happy. But for they wouldn't have been so happy but for they wouldn't have been so happy. But for the first time in a long time what we do the first time in a long time what we do the first time in a long time.
What we do know is that the pages will be authored know is that the pages will be authored know is that the pages will be authored by you, by all of us. The American people will be in charge, the American people will be in charge, the American people will be in charge your voice, your desires, your hopes and your voice, your desires, your hopes and your voice, your desires, your hopes and aspirations will never again fall on aspirations.
Will never, again, fall on aspirations will never again fall on deaf ears and they were on deaf ears, you deaf ears and they were on deaf ears, you deaf ears and they were on deaf ears. You will be the captains of your destiny, will be the captains of your destiny, will be the captains of your destiny once more together, what we raise incomes once more together, what we raise incomes once more together, what we raise incomes and your incomes are going to Go up and and your incomes are going to go up and and your incomes are going to go up and your incomes are going to go up.
You know, your incomes are going to go up. You know, your incomes are going to go up. You know, we have this phony unemployment number. We have this phony unemployment number. We have this phony unemployment number that you look around for a job. You can't - that you look around for a job, you can't - that you look around for a job, you can't find it.
You go and quit, you go home to find it, you go and quit, you go home to find it, you go and quit, you go home to your wife or your husband or your - your wife or your husband or your - your wife or your husband or your Parents and they consider you parents and they consider you parents and they consider you statistically employed and then they say statistically employed and then they say statistically employed.
And then they say we're down at five percent and four we're down at five percent. And four, we're down at five percent and four point nine, it's nonsense, but we want point nine, it's nonsense, but we want point nine, it's nonsense, but we want incomes to go up and we want to create incomes to go up and we want to create incomes To go up and we want to create millions and millions of new jobs and millions and millions of new jobs and millions and millions of new jobs and that's what we're going to do.
And we - that's what we're going to do. And we - that's what we're going to do and we can't lose our companies, can't lose our - can't lose our companies, can't lose our, can't lose our companies, can't lose our companies. If we're gonna do that, we will companies if we're gonna do that, we will companies if we're gonna do that, we will lower taxes, unleash American energy and lower taxes, unleash American energy and lower taxes, unleash American energy and bring thousands of new companies To our bring thousands of new companies to our bring thousands of new companies to our shores shores shores, we will reestablish the rule of law and we will reestablish the rule of law and we will reestablish the rule of law and appoint justices to the United States.
Appoint justices to the United States, appoint justices to the United States Supreme Court who will uphold and defend Supreme Court who will uphold and defend Supreme Court who will uphold and defend the Constitution of our country. And by the way, I used to, you know the - and by the way, I used to, you know the - and by the way, I used to, you know, the never Trump errs, remember they're really never Trump errs.
Remember, they're really never Trump errs. Remember, they're really there on a respirator right now. They're there on a respirator right now. They're there on a respirator right now. They're gasping. You know, they're gasping for air gasping. You know, they're gasping for air gasping. You know, they're gasping for air and many of them have been great.
They've and many of them have been great. They've and many of them have been great. They've come over in there. They've been great come over in there. They've been great come over in there. They've been great, but I used to want you know early on, but I used to want you know early on, but I used to want you know early on where we had the never Trump, never Trump where we had the never Trump, never Trump where we had The never Trump, never Trump, I will never vote for Trump.
Some of I will never vote for Trump. Some of I will never vote for Trump. Some of those people are now saying I'd only - those people are now saying I'd only - those people are now saying I'd only vote for Trump. I love this guy's crazy vote for Trump. I love this guy's crazy vote for Trump. I love this guy's crazy, but they didn't know me, they didn't know, but they didn't know me, they didn't know, but they didn't know me, they didn't know.
But you know, I used to say if for no, but you know, I used to say if for no. But you know, I used to say if for no other reason I felt like this character, other reason I felt like this character, other reason I felt like this character in Utah, right, who the hell was he I mean in Utah, right, who the hell was?
He - I mean in Utah, right, who the hell was? He - I mean what happened to him, remember he's gonna what happened to him, remember he's gonna what happened to him. Remember he's gonna win Utah. He was a conservative, he said win Utah. He was a conservative, he said win Utah. He was a conservative. He said he's a conservative and he's gonna win.
He's a conservative and he's gonna win. He's a conservative and he's gonna win. Utah, I said. So what he wins you too. So Utah, I said so what he wins you too. So Utah I said, so what he wins you too. So what does it mean? So let's say that it - what does it mean? So let's say that it - what does it mean?
So let's say that it mattered a lot and I lost, so that means mattered a lot and I lost. So that means mattered a lot and I lost. So that means that Hillary would have gotten to that. Hillary would have gotten to that. Hillary would have gotten to appoint justices of the United States, appoint justices of the United States, appoint justices of the United States Supreme Court, right?
I'm trying to figure Supreme Court, right? I'm trying to figure Supreme Court, right? I'm trying to figure it. And by the way, not only did he not it, and by the way, not only did he not it. And by the way, not only did he not when Utah - I won Utah in a massive - when Utah - I won Utah in a massive - when Utah - I won Utah in a massive landslide, even though the press was landslide, even though the press was landslide, even though the Press was saying it would tied, he came in third saying it would tied, he came in third saying it would tied, he came in third place, Hillary beat him.
So I don't know place. Hillary beat him. So I don't know place. Hillary beat him. So I don't know what happened to this guy, but I thought what happened to this guy, but I thought what happened to this guy, but I thought it was terrible because it was - so it was terrible because it was - so it was terrible because it was so Destructive and I used to say to people destructive and I used to say to people destructive and I used to say to people if for no other reason vote for me if if for no other reason vote for me.
If - if for no other reason vote for me, if for no other reason, it's the United for no other reason, it's the United for no other reason. It's the United States Supreme Court, right States, Supreme Court, right States, Supreme Court, right, and Justice Scalia who was great. I heard and Justice Scalia, who was great I heard and Justice Scalia, who was great.
I heard about two weeks ago, I heard his wife who about two weeks ago, I heard his wife who about two weeks ago, I heard his wife, who was an unbelievable woman and respected was an unbelievable woman and respected, was an unbelievable woman and respected. She had signs Trump signs on her front. She had signs Trump signs on her front.
She had signs Trump signs on her front lawn in Washington or Virginia, but she lawn in Washington or Virginia, but she lawn in Washington or Virginia. But she had Trump signs just like that one. Had Trump signs just like that one had Trump signs just like that one Trump pence, how good is pence by the way, Trump pence, how good is pence by the way, Trump pence, how good is pence, by the way, right?
A lot of times, if they question a lot of times, if they question a lot of times, if they question something I'm doing, they'll say well, but something I'm doing, they'll say well, but something I'm doing, they'll say well, but he picked my pence. I mean how can you - do he picked my pence, I mean how can you - do he picked my pence, I mean how can you do better than that?
Mike Pence is great, but better than that. Mike Pence is great, but better than that. Mike Pence is great, but you know what, she has cup signs and one, you know what she has cup signs and one you know what she has cup signs and one and I called her and I said hi and I and I called her and I said Hi and I and I called her and I said hi and I just wanted to thank you for the signs.
Just wanted to thank you for the signs. Just wanted to thank you for the signs or your lunches. I have them on my car or your lunches. I have them on my car or your lunches. I have them on my car too. She's phenomenal, she's gonna be at too. She's phenomenal, she's gonna be at too. She's phenomenal. She's gonna be at the inauguration, but what a phenomenal the inauguration.
But what a phenomenal the inauguration, but what a phenomenal woman, but her husband, I mean we thought woman, but her husband, I mean we thought woman, but her husband, I mean we thought he'd be around for a long time and these - he'd be around for a long Time and these - he'd be around for a long time and these are the things that happen.
So we have to are the things that happen. So we have to are the things that happen. So we have to replace Justice Scalia with a person replace Justice Scalia with a person replace Justice Scalia with a person that is as close to Justice Scalia if that is as close to Justice Scalia if that is as close to Justice Scalia if that's possible.
As we can get - and we'll - that's possible as we can get and we'll - that's possible as we can get and we'll be doing that. But I used to say to be doing that, but I used to say to be doing that. But I used to say to people, I mean, if forget about everything, people, I mean, if forget about everything, people, I mean, if forget about everything else, justices of the United States else, justices of the United States else, justices of the United States Supreme Court will fight For our great Supreme Court will fight for our great Supreme Court will fight for our great schools and we want to make them schools and we want to make them schools and we want to make them incredible.
We want to make our schools incredible. We want to make our schools incredible. We want to make our schools really good right now, really good right now, really good right now. They have big problems in many cases, but they have big problems in many cases, but they have big problems in many cases. But we're gonna fight for them, we will - we're gonna fight for them.
We will - we're gonna fight for them. We will restore respect for our country. We're restore respect for our country, we're restore respect for our country. We're going to restore respect for every inch going to restore respect for every inch going to restore respect for every inch of our soil. And we're going to restore of our soil and we're going to restore of our soil and we're going to restore the respect of our people, our people, the respect of our people, our people, the respect of our people, our people love this country.
We love it to us, it is love this country. We love it to us. It is love this country. We love it to us. It is a great country, a great country, a great country. But when I say make America great again, but when I say make America great again, but when I say make America great again, that's what I'm talking about.
That theme, that's what I'm talking about. That theme, that's what I'm talking about. That theme has really caught on because it's make - has really caught on because it's make - has really caught on because it's make America great again and it will be great America, great again and it will be great America, great again and it will be great again and It will happen quickly, we will heal our divisions and unify our - we will heal our divisions and unify our - we will heal our divisions and unify our country.
In fact you know Time magazine country in fact you know Time magazine country in fact you know Time magazine they were both nice and a little bit. They were both nice and a little bit. They were both nice and a little bit wise guy yesterday, they gave me the wise guy yesterday. They gave me the wise guy yesterday.
They gave me the Person of the Year, Person of the Year, Person of the Year. He's - it used to be called the man of the - he's - it used to be called the man of the - he's it used to be called the man of the announce called the person of the year announce called the person of the year announce called the person of The year that's good, they're politically correct, that's good.
They're politically correct, that's good. They're politically correct. They were very politically correct, who'd they were very politically correct, who'd they were very politically correct, who'd rather have it the man of the year rather have it the man of the year rather have it the man of the year. Look, the web minerals, okay, seriously cuz, look the web minerals, okay, seriously cuz, look the web minerals, okay.
Seriously cuz I want its Person of the Year, so years I want its Person of the Year. So years I want its Person of the Year so years or was the Man of the Year, right and I or was the Man of the Year, right? And I - or was the Man of the Year, right? And I think even if a woman was named, it was think even if a woman was named, it was think even if a woman was named, it was the video.
So it's a little bit shaky who the video, so it's a little bit shaky who the video. So it's a little bit shaky who would rather have it be the person of would rather have it be the person of would rather have it be the person of the year. I got a lot of women here, what the year, I got a lot of women here, what the year, I got a lot of women here.
What about the women, let's do it again, who about the women, let's do it again, who about the women, let's do it again. Who would rather have it be the person of would rather have it be the person of would rather have it be the person of the year. A couple of people who would - the year - a couple of people who would the year a couple of people who would rather have it be the man of the year.
Maybe why that that could be? Why the - maybe why that that could be? Why the - maybe why that that could be why the magazine business isn't so great, right? I magazine business isn't so great, right? I magazine business isn't so great, right? I don't think of it all the women wanted, don't think of it all the women wanted, don't think of it all.
The women wanted to be the man of the year anywhere who to be the man of the year anywhere who to be the man of the year anywhere who, yes, but it's persevere. But they said you yes, but it's persevere. But they said you yes, but it's persevere, but they said, you know, looking over a divided nation know, looking over a divided nation know, looking over a divided nation, you saw that.
So they're taking a shot. You saw that. So they're taking a shot. You saw that. So they're taking a shot, but I said wait a minute, I haven't, but I said wait a minute, I haven't. But I said wait a minute. I haven't learned this yet. I haven't run it so learned this yet. I haven't run it so learned this yet.
I haven't run it, so they're not, you know, you're being, oh, they're not, you know, you're being, oh, they're not, you know, you're being - oh, you're trying to be a little bit nasty. You're trying to be a little bit nasty. You're trying to be a little bit nasty, but I haven't run anything. So it is a - but I haven't run anything.
So it is a - but I haven't run anything. So it is a divided nation. We're gonna bring our divided nation. We're gonna bring our divided nation, we're gonna bring our nation together when Americans are nation together, when Americans are nation together, when Americans are unified, there is nothing, we cannot do, no unified.
There is nothing, we cannot do no unified. There is nothing we cannot do no test, two great, no dream too large, no test, two great, no dream too large, no test, two great, no dream too large. No goal beyond our reach. My message today goal beyond our reach my message today goal beyond our reach. My message today is number one, get out to vote tomorrow is number one, get out to vote.
Tomorrow is number one, get out to vote tomorrow for John Kennedy at simple and our great for John Kennedy at simple and our great for John Kennedy at simple and our great soon-to-be congressman. You got ta get out, soon-to-be congressman, you got ta get out, soon-to-be congressman. You got ta get out to vote, then I pay my respects his to vote.
Then I pay my respects his to vote. Then I pay my respects his family today is for all Americans from family today is for all Americans from family today is for all Americans. From all parties, all beliefs, all walks of all parties, all beliefs, all walks of all parties, all beliefs, all walks of life no matter your age, your income, your life, no matter your age, your income, your life, no matter your age, your income, your background, I'm asking You to join this background, I'm asking you to join this background.
I'm asking you to join this incredible movement. There has never been incredible movement. There has never been incredible movement. There has never been a movement like this or actually hasn't a movement like this or actually hasn't a movement like this or actually hasn't. You know, yesterday they were talking, you know, yesterday they were talking, you know, yesterday they were talking about.
They're trying to find a about - they're trying to find a about they're trying to find a comparable. You know, usually you go back comparable, you know, usually you go back comparable. You know, usually you go back to Reagan, you go back to something right, to Reagan. You go back to something right to Reagan, you go back to something, right?
It's not so long ago, although in the - it's not so long ago, although in the - it's not so long ago, although in the history of the state of Louisiana, I was history of the state of Louisiana. I was history of the state of Louisiana. I was just told us backstage by all of my just told us backstage by all of my - just told us backstage by all of my people.
We got more votes than any people. We got more votes than any people. We got more votes than any Republican in the history of the state, Republican in the history of the state, Republican in the history of the state of Louisiana. Is that good? I want to give up some of them for John. I want to give up some of them for John, I want to give up some of them for John Kennedy tomorrow, I'll take - we'll take Kennedy tomorrow, I'll take - we'll take Kennedy.
Tomorrow, I'll take - we'll take 10 % off the top. So I'm asking you to 10 % off the top, so I'm asking you to 10 % off the top. So I'm asking you to dream big and bold and daring things for dream big and bold and daring things for dream big and bold and daring things for yourself and for your country.
I'm asking yourself and for your country, I'm asking yourself and for your country. I'm asking you to believe in yourself again and I'm you to believe in yourself again and I'm you to believe in yourself again. And I'm asking you to believe in America again asking you to believe in America again asking you to believe in America again.
And if we do that, then all together we - and if we do that, then all together we - and if we do that, then all together we will make America so very strong again will make America so very strong again will make America so very strong. Again, we will make America rich again, we will - we will make America rich again, we will - we will make America rich again.
We will make America safe again and we will make - make America safe again and we will make make America safe again and we will make America great. Again. Thank you, Louisiana, America, great. Again, thank you Louisiana, America, great again, thank you, Louisiana. God bless you. It's great to be here, god bless you, it's great to be here.
God bless you, it's great to be here. Thank you, Donald. J Trump wrapping up. Thank you. Donald. J. Trump wrapping up. Thank you. Donald J Trump wrapping up remarks at the - get out the vote rally remarks at the get out the vote rally remarks at the get out the vote rally for John Kennedy in Louisiana.
Thank you for John Kennedy in Louisiana. Thank you for John Kennedy in Louisiana. Thank you all for watching our stream. Don't forget all for watching our stream. Don't forget all for watching our stream. Don't forget we have another one coming up in Grand. We have another one coming up in Grand. We have another one coming up in Grand Rapids tonight at 7 p.m.
Eastern, though Rapids tonight at 7 p.m. Eastern, though Rapids tonight at 7 p.m. Eastern, though it will probably be late. As you can see, it will probably be late. As you can see, it will probably be late as you can see, we're already a little behind schedule. We're already a little behind schedule. We're already a little behind schedule here.
So but to name we'll have live here. So - but to name, we'll have live here. So, but to name, we'll have live reports from Grand Rapids. We have a full reports from Grand Rapids. We have a full reports from Grand Rapids. We have a full crew on the scene for the first time. Crew on the scene for the first time.
Crew on the scene for the first time you'll be able to see that live tonight. You'll be able to see that live tonight. You'll be able to see that live tonight right here on right side broadcasting. We right here on right side broadcasting. We right here on right side broadcasting. We appreciate you tuning in and putting up - appreciate you tuning in and putting up, appreciate you tuning in and putting up with our stream issues.
That's a hangar with our stream issues. That's a hangar with our stream issues. That's a hangar, so we haven't used our little portable. So we haven't used our little portable. So we haven't used our little portable live view unit there and also the audio live view unit there and also the audio live view unit there.
And also the audio issue that happened about ten minutes issue that happened about ten minutes issue that happened about ten minutes ago was not exclusive to us, but ago was not exclusive to us, but ago was not exclusive to us, but everybody that was not the pool Camera, everybody that was not the pool camera, everybody that was not the pool camera.
So thank you all for tuning in and we'll - so thank you all for tuning in and we'll - so thank you all for tuning in and we'll see you hopefully back here tonight at 7. See you hopefully back here tonight at 7. See you hopefully back here tonight. At 7 o'clock Eastern o'clock, Eastern o'clock Eastern, maybe we'll start a little earlier, we'll maybe we'll start a little earlier.
We'll maybe we'll start a little earlier. We'll see where Trump is and what the schedule see where Trump is and what the schedule see where Trump is. And what the schedule looks like it as far as when he's and looks like it as far as when he's and looks like it as far as when he's and expected to arrive, have a great day, see, expected to arrive, have a great day, see expected to Arrive have a great day.